District of Columbia statutes.
4-518

Appropriations.

Funds may be appropriated as necessary to carry out this chapter.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 19, 44 DCR 1142
This section is referenced in § 4-515.
1981 Ed., § 3-438.
See note to § 4-501.
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 4-519, see § 202(e) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).